Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.150

Priority of expenditures—Appropriated and nonappropriated funds—Matching funds, disburse state moneys proportionally.

(1) For those agencies that make expenditures from both appropriated and nonappropriated funds for the same purpose, the governor shall direct such agencies to charge their expenditures in such ratio, as between appropriated and nonappropriated funds, as will conserve appropriated funds. For institutions of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, this subsection applies only to operating fee accounts.

(2) Unless otherwise provided by law, if state moneys are appropriated for a capital project and matching funds or other contributions are required as a condition of the receipt of the state moneys, the state moneys shall be disbursed in proportion to and only to the extent that the matching funds or other contributions have been received and are available for expenditure.

(3) The office of financial management shall adopt guidelines for the implementation of this section. The guidelines may account for federal matching requirements or other requirements to spend other moneys in a particular manner.

[ 2012 c 230 s 7; 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 948; 1995 c 6 s 1; 1991 c 284 s 3; 1981 c 270 s 10; 1965 c 8 s 43.88.150. Prior: 1959 c 328 s 15.]

NOTES:

Savings report—2012 c 230: See RCW 28B.10.0291.

Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 50: See note following RCW 15.76.115.

Effective date—1995 c 6: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [April 12, 1995]." [ 1995 c 6 s 2.]

Effective date—Severability—1981 c 270: See notes following RCW 43.88.010.